District of Columbia statutes.
2-1212.24

Other incentives.

(a)

The Zoning Commission should adopt regulations that permit bonus density or other appropriate zoning flexibility for projects in eligible areas with grocery stores, consistent with the Comprehensive Plan.

(b)

When considering applications for special exceptions or planned unit developments, the Zoning Commission and Board of Zoning Adjustment should give favorable weight to projects with grocery stores in eligible areas.

(c)

Grocery stores in eligible areas shall be eligible for the Green Building Expedited Construction Documents Review Program established by § 6-1451.06 notwithstanding that they fail to qualify as green buildings under § 6-1451.01(17).

History

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-353, § 204, 58 DCR 746